src/scripts/Polish/lseq.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021  Zvonimir Stanecic <zvonimirek222@yandex.com>, grzegorz Zlotowicz, <grzezlo@wp.pl>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define TranscribeLetterSequence 
a -> a || _ ,, 
ą -> on || _ ,, 
b -> b e || _ ,, 
c -> c e || _ ,, 
ć -> ci e || _ ,, 
d -> d e || _ ,, 
e -> e || _ ,, 
ę -> en  || _ ,, 
f -> e f || _ ,, 
g -> g y e || _ ,, 
h -> h a || _ ,, 
i -> i || _ ,, 
j -> y o t || _ ,, 
k -> k a || _ ,, 
l -> e l || _ ,, 
ł -> e w || _ ,, 
m -> e m || _ ,, 
n -> e n || _ ,, 
ń -> e ni || _ ,, 
o -> o || _ ,, 
ó -> u || _ ,, 
p -> p e || _ ,, 
q -> k u || _ ,, 
r -> e r || _ ,, 
s -> e s || _ ,, 
ś -> e si || _ ,, 
t -> t e || _ ,, 
u -> u || _ ,, 
v -> f a w || _ ,, 
w -> v u || _ ,, 
x -> i k s || _ ,, 
y -> i g r e k || _ ,,
z -> z e t || _ ,,
ź -> zi e t || _ ,, 
ż -> zh e t || _ ;

define VowelPhonem [a | on | e | en | i | o | u | ih ] ;

define procStress1 [a:a1|
on:on1|
e:e1|
en:en1|
i:i1|
o:o1|
u:u1|
ih:ih1
] @-> ||
_ \VowelPhonem+ VowelPhonem+ .#.,
_ \VowelPhonem+ VowelPhonem+ \VowelPhonem+ .#.,
.#. \VowelPhonem+ _ \VowelPhonem+ .#.;

define procStress2 [a:a0|
on:on0|
e:e0|
en:en0|
i:i0|
o:o0|
u:u0|
ih:ih0
] @-> || _ ;

regex 
TranscribeLetterSequence .o.
procStress1 .o. procStress2; 
